Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,177
Nonresident vehicles; prohibited acts.

It shall be unlawful to operate trucks, truck-tractors, trailers, or buses owned by nonresidents who are not in compliance with sections 60-3,178 to 60-3,182 or any agreement executed under the authority granted in sections 60-3,180 to 60-3,182.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 177.